Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Library, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,202,817.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $475,072
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts other
than those described in section 3 of this 2019 Act, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,567,305 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses  from moneys received from the assessment against state agencies de-
scribed in ORS  357.203 and transferred to the Miscellaneous Receipts Account for the State
Library.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,225,997 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House April 15, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5518 (SB 5518-A) Page 2